Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1921
Quality assurance assessment; payments;
form.

Each
nursing facility or skilled nursing facility shall pay the quality assurance
assessment to the department on a quarterly basis after the medical assistance
payment rates of the facility are adjusted pursuant to section 68-1926. The
department shall prepare and distribute a form on which a nursing facility
or skilled nursing facility shall calculate and report the quality assurance
assessment. A nursing facility or skilled nursing facility shall submit the
completed form with the quality assurance assessment no later than thirty
days following the end of each calendar quarter.

Laws 2011, LB600, § 21.